Washington statutes.
RCW 16.52.320

Maliciously killing or causing substantial bodily harm to livestock belonging to another—Penalty.

(1) It is unlawful for a person to, with malice, kill or cause substantial bodily harm to livestock belonging to another person.

(2) A violation of this section constitutes a class C felony.

[ 2015 c 235 s 4; 2011 c 67 s 1.]